hr-HR: Veličina papira za motanje: 1 1/2; 1 1/4; Tuljac od 84 mm; Tuljac od 98 mm; Double Wide; King Size; King Size Slim; Single Wide; Slim; Ultra Thin; Ostalo
en: Rolling paper size: 1 1/2; 1 1/4; 84 mm cone; 98 mm cone; Double Wide; King Size; King Size Slim; Single Wide; Slim; Ultra Thin; Other
pt-BR: Papel para enrolar tamanho: 1 1/2; 1 1/4; Cone de 84 mm; Cone de 98 mm; Double Wide; King Size; King Size Slim; Single Wide; Slim; Ultrafino; Outro
tr: Sarma kağıdı boyutu: 1 1/2; 1 1/4; 84 mm koni; 98 mm koni; Double Wide; King Size; King Size Slim; Single Wide; Slim; Ultra ince; Diğer
hu: Sodrópapír mérete: 1 1/2; 1 1/4; 84 mm-es tölcsér; 98 mm-es tölcsér; Duplaszéles; King Size; King Size Slim; Szimplaszéles; Slim; Ultravékony; Egyéb
de: Größe des Drehpapiers: 1 1/2; 1 1/4; 84-mm-Cone; 98-mm-Cone; Double Wide; King Size; King Size Slim; Single Wide; Slim; Ultra Thin; Sonstige
lt-LT: Sukimo popieriaus dydis: 1 1/2; 1 1/4; 84 mm kūgis; 98 mm kūgis; Dvigubo pločio; „King Size“; „King Size Slim“; Viengubo pločio; „Slim“; Ypač ploni; Kita
ru: Размер бумаги для самокруток: 1 1/2; 1 1/4; Конус 84 мм; Конус 98 мм; Double Wide; King Size; King Size Slim; Single Wide; Slim; Ultra Thin; Другое
da: Rullepapirstørrelse: 1 1/2; 1 1/4; Cone på 84 mm; Cone på 98 mm; Double Wide; King Size; King Size Slim; Single Wide; Slim; Ultra Thin; Andet
pl: Rozmiar bibułki: 1 1/2; 1 1/4; Stożek 84 mm; Stożek 98 mm; Double Wide; King Size; King Size Slim; Single Wide; Slim; Ultra Thin; Inny
bg-BG: Размер на хартията за свиване: 1 1/2; 1 1/4; 84 мм фунийка; 98 мм фунийка; Double Wide; King Size; King Size Slim; Single Wide; Slim; Ultra Thin; Друго
nb: Størrelse på rullepapir: 1 1/2; 1 1/4; 84 mm cone; 98 mm cone; Double wide; King size; King size slim; Single wide; Slim; Ekstra tynn; Annet
zh-TW: 捲紙尺寸: 1 1/2; 1 1/4; 84 公釐錐形; 98 公釐錐形; 加倍寬度; 特大號; 特大號細長型; 單倍寬度; 細長型; 超薄型; 其他
ko: 롤링페이퍼 사이즈: 1 1/2; 1 1/4; 84mm 콘; 98mm 콘; 더블 와이드; 킹 사이즈; 킹 사이즈 슬림; 싱글 와이드; 슬림; 울트라 씬; 기타
fi: Käärepaperin koko: 1 1/2; 1 1/4; 84 mm:n kartio; 98 mm:n kartio; Double Wide; King Size; King Size Slim; Single Wide; Slim; Ultra Thin; Muu
nl: Vloei maat: 1 1/2; 1 1/4; 84 mm cone; 98 mm cone; Double Wide; King Size; King Size Slim; Single Wide; Slim; Ultra Thin; Overige
el: Μέγεθος χαρτιού στριφτού: 1 1/2; 1 1/4; Κώνος 84 mm; Κώνος 98 mm; Double Wide; King Size; King Size Slim; Single Wide; Slim; Ultra Thin; Άλλο
ro-RO: Dimensiunea hârtiei de rulat: 1 1/2; 1 1/4; Con 84 mm; Con 98 mm; Double Wide; King Size; King Size Slim; Single Wide; Slim; Ultra Thin; Altele
es: Tamaño del papel para armar: 1 1/2; 1 1/4; 84 mm cone; 98 mm cone; Doble ancho; King Size; King Size Slim; Ancho simple; Slim; Extrafino; Otro
cs: Velikost cigaretového papírku: 1 1/2; 1 1/4; 84mm kornout; 98mm kornout; Double Wide; King Size; King Size Slim; Single Wide; Slim; Ultra Thin; Jiné
th: การกลิ้งเรื่องของกระดาษ: 1 1/2; 1 1/4; กรวย 84 มม.; กรวย 98 มม.; ดับเบิลไวด์; คิงไซส์; คิงไซส์สลิม; ซิงเกิลไวด์; สลิม; บางพิเศษ; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 卷烟纸尺寸: 1 1/2; 1 1/4; 84 毫米锥形; 98 毫米锥形; 双倍宽; 加大尺寸; 加大超薄; 单倍宽; 超薄/修长; 极薄; 其他
vi: Kích thước giấy cuốn: 1 1/2; 1 1/4; Côn 84 mm; Côn 98 mm; Double Wide; King Size; King Size Slim; Single Wide; Slim; Ultra Thin; Khác
fr: Taille du papier à rouler: 1 1/2; 1 1/4; Cône 84 mm; Cône 98 mm; Double Wide; King Size; King Size Slim; Single Wide; Slim; Ultra Thin; Autre
sk-SK: Veľkosť cigaretového papiera: 1 1/2; 1 1/4; 84 mm kónus; 98 mm kónus; Double Wide; King Size; King Size Slim; Single Wide; Slim; Ultra Thin; Iné
sl-SI: Velikost cigaretnega papirčka: 1 1/2; 1 1/4; Stožec (84 mm); Stožec (98 mm); Dvojna širina; King Size; King Size Slim; Enojna širina; Slim; Ultra tanki; Drugo
ja: ローリングペーパーの寸法: 1 1/2; 1 1/4; 84 mm コーン; 98 mm コーン; ダブルワイド; キングサイズ; キングサイズ スリム; シングルワイド; スリム; ウルトラシン; その他
it: Dimensioni della cartina: 1 1/2; 1 1/4; Cono 84 mm; Cono 98 mm; Double Wide; King Size; King Size Slim; Single Wide; Slim; Ultra sottile; Altro
pt-PT: Tamanho do papel de enrolar: 1 1/2; 1 1/4; Cone de 84 mm; Cone de 98 mm; Double Wide; King Size; King Size Slim; Single Wide; Slim; Ultrafino; Outro
sv: Rullpapper – storlek: 1 1/2; 1 1/4; 84 mm kon; 98 mm kon; Double wide; King size; King size slim; Single wide; Slim; Ultratunn; Övrigt